Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1714
Unprofessional conduct.

For purposes of the Massage Therapy Practice Act, unprofessional conduct includes the conduct listed in section 38-179 and the provision by a massage therapist of sexual stimulation as part of massage therapy.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 621.